Washington statutes.
RCW 10.122.020

Definitions.

In this chapter:

(1) "Custodial interrogation" means express questioning or other actions or words by a law enforcement officer which are reasonably likely to elicit an incriminating response from an individual and occurs when reasonable individuals in the same circumstances would consider themselves in custody.

(2) "Electronic recording" means an audio recording or audio and video recording that accurately records a custodial interrogation. "Record electronically" and "recorded electronically" have a corresponding meaning.

(3) "Law enforcement agency" means a general authority Washington law enforcement agency or limited authority Washington law enforcement agency as those terms are defined in RCW 10.93.020.

(4) "Law enforcement officer" means a general authority Washington peace officer or limited authority Washington peace officer as those terms are defined in RCW 10.93.020.

(5) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, statutory trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, or government; governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; or any other legal or commercial entity.

(6) "Place of detention" means a fixed location under the control of a law enforcement agency where individuals are questioned about alleged crimes or status offenses. The term includes a jail, police or sheriff's station, holding cell, correctional or detention facility, police vehicle, and[,] in the case of juveniles, schools.

(7) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(8) "Statement" means a communication whether oral, written, electronic, or nonverbal.

[ 2021 c 329 s 2.]